Utah statutes.
78B-6-1202.   Complaint -- To set forth interests of all parties.

(1)  The interests of all persons in the property, whether the persons are known or unknown, shall be set forth in the complaint, specifically and particularly, as far as known to the plaintiff.

(2)  If one or more of the parties, or the share or quantity of interest of any of the parties, is unknown to the plaintiff, uncertain or contingent, or the ownership of the inheritance depends upon an executory devise, or the remainder is a contingent remainder making the parties unknown, that fact must be set forth in the complaint.

